src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Noun inflection
! ---------------
!! Livvi Karelian nouns inflect in cases.
!! Vowel harmony involves front and back
!! Gradation does not affect all consonants, therefore
!! there are three values: Yes, No and NA (not applicable)


!! ## The file proper
!LEXICON OTHER-TIME ! adhoc
!# ;

LEXICON N_BOBA ! adhoc
N_KALA ;

LEXICON N_
+Sg+Nom+TYÄ: # ;

!! ### ONE-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS ENDING IN LONG VOWEL SEGMENT
LEXICON N_SUO !!≈ @CODE@ suo:suo
!! Gradation: No
!! Harmony: Back
!:%{back%} ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
:%{back%} NMN_KUU/PII ;

LEXICON N_VYÖ !!≈ @CODE@ vyö:vyö
!! Gradation: No
!! Harmony: Front
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
:%{front%} NMN_VYÖ ;

LEXICON N_KUU !!≈ @CODE@ kuu:kuu
!! Gradation: No
!! Harmony: Back
!:%{back%} ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
 N_KUU-SG ;
 N_KUU-PL ;
LEXICON N_KUU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_KUU/PII-SG ;
LEXICON N_KUU-PL
:%{back%} NMN_KUU/PII-PL ;

LEXICON N_PII !!≈ @CODE@ pii:pii
!! Gradation: No
!! Harmony: front
!:%{front%} ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
 N_PII-SG ;
 N_PII-PL ;
LEXICON N_PII-SG
:%{front%} NMN_KUU/PII-SG ;
LEXICON N_PII-PL
:%{front%} NMN_KUU/PII-PL ;

LEXICON N_MUA !!≈ @CODE@ mua:mua
!! Gradation: No
!! Harmony: Back
!:%{back%} ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
:%{back%} NMN_MUA ;

LEXICON N_PIÄ !!≈ @CODE@ piä:piä
!! Gradation: No
!! Harmony: Front
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
 N_PIÄ-SG ;
 N_PIÄ-PL ;
LEXICON N_PIÄ-SG
:%{front%} NMN_PIÄ-SG ;
LEXICON N_PIÄ-PL
:%{front%} NMN_PIÄ-PL ;

!! ### TWO-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS

LEXICON N_PAPPI !!≈ @CODE@ pappi:pappi
!! Gradation: Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!! stem final i is retained
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
	N_PAPPI-SG ;
	N_PAPPI-PL ;
LEXICON N_PAPPI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_PAPPI/HÄKKI-SG ;
LEXICON N_PAPPI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_PAPPI/HÄKKI-PL ;

LEXICON N_HÄKKI !!≈ @CODE@ häkki:häkki
!! Gradation: Yes
!! Harmony: Front
!! stem final i is retained
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
	N_HÄKKI-SG ;
	N_HÄKKI-PL ;
LEXICON N_HÄKKI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_PAPPI/HÄKKI-SG ;
LEXICON N_HÄKKI-PL
:%{front%} NMN_PAPPI/HÄKKI-PL ;

LEXICON N_LEIRI !!≈ @CODE@ leiri:leiri
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!! stem	final i is retained
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
	N_LEIRI-SG ;
	N_LEIRI-PL ;
LEXICON N_LEIRI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_ARTELI/LEIRI-SG ;
LEXICON N_LEIRI-PL
:%{front%} NMN_ARTELI/LEIRI-PL ;

LEXICON N_PADA !!≈ @CODE@ pada:pada
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!! stem final a changes to u in Sg Par
!! stem final a changes to o before i in Pl stem
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
	N_PADA-SG  ;
	N_PADA-PL  ;
LEXICON N_PADA-SG
:%{back%} NMN_PADA ;
LEXICON N_PADA-PL
:%{back%} NMN_PADA-PL ;


LEXICON N_KALA !!≈ @CODE@ kala:kala
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!! stem final a changes to u in Sg Par
!! stem final a changes to o before i in Pl stem
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
	N_KALA-SG  ;
	N_KALA-PL  ;
LEXICON N_KALA-SG
:%{back%} NMN_KALA ;
LEXICON N_KALA-PL
:%{back%} NMN_KALA-PL ;
LEXICON N-HUM_KALA
+Sem/Hum: NMN_KALA ;

LEXICON N_OZA !!≈ @CODE@ oza:oza
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!! stem final a changes to u in Sg Par
!! stem final a changes to 0 before i in Pl stem
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
	N_OZA-SG  ;
	N_OZA-PL  ;

LEXICON N_OZA-SG
:%{back%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ-SG ;

LEXICON N_OZA-PL
:%{back%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ-PL ;

LEXICON N_SÄYNÄ !!≈ @CODE@ säynä:säynä
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!! stem final ä changes to i in Sg Par
!! stem final ä changes to 0 before i in Pl stem

!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
	N_SÄYNÄ-SG  ;
	N_SÄYNÄ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_SÄYNÄ-SG
:%{front%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ-SG ;

LEXICON N_SÄYNÄ-PL
:%{front%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ-PL ;

!LEXICON N_BOBA !!≈ @CODE@ boba:boba
!!! Gradation YES
!!! Harmony: Back
!!! stem final a changes to u in Sg Par
!!! stem final a changes to 0 before i in Pl stem
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
!	N_BOBA-SG  ;
!	N_BOBA-PL  ;

!LEXICON N_BOBA-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_BOBA/XX-SG ;

!LEXICON N_BOBA-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_BOBA/XX-PL ;

LEXICON N_KOIVU !!≈ @CODE@ koivu:koivu
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!! There are no changes in stem-final **u**
!! Plural stem in **loi**
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
        N_KOIVU-SG ;
        N_KOIVU-PL ;

LEXICON N_KOIVU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_KOIVU/HERY-SG        ;

LEXICON N_KOIVU-PL
:%{back%} NMN_KOIVU/HERY-PL        ;

LEXICON N_HERY !!≈ @CODE@ hery:hery
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!! There are no	changes	in stem-final **y**
!! Plural stem in **löi**
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; 
        N_HERY-SG ;
        N_HERY-PL ;

LEXICON N_HERY-SG
:%{front%} NMN_KOIVU/HERY-SG        ;

LEXICON N_HERY-PL
:%{front%} NMN_KOIVU/HERY-PL        ;

LEXICON N_IDY !!≈ @CODE@ idy:idy
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
!! There are no changes in stem-final **y**
!! Plural stem in **löi**
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_IDY-SG ;
        N_IDY-PL ;

LEXICON N_IDY-SG
:%{front%} NMN_LUGU/IDY-SG        ;

LEXICON N_IDY-PL
:%{front%} NMN_LUGU/IDY-PL        ;

LEXICON N_LUGU !!≈ @CODE@ lugu:lugu
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!! There are no changes in stem-final **u**
!! Plural stem in **loi**
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_LUGU-SG ;
        N_LUGU-PL ;

LEXICON N_LUGU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_LUGU/IDY-SG        ;

LEXICON N_LUGU-PL
:%{back%} NMN_LUGU/IDY-PL        ;

LEXICON N_RUNO !!≈ @CODE@ runo:runo
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!! Stem-fianl o changes to u in Sg Par
!! Plural stem in **loi**
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	 N_RUNO-SG ;
	 N_RUNO-PL ;

LEXICON N_RUNO-SG
:%{back%} NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_RUNO-PL
:%{back%} NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_HÖRÖ !!≈ @CODE@ hörö:hörö
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	 N_HÖRÖ-SG ;
	 N_HÖRÖ-PL ;

LEXICON N_HÖRÖ-SG
:%{front%} NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_HÖRÖ-PL
:%{front%} NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_RUADO !!≈ @CODE@ ruado:ruado
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	 N_RUADO-SG ;
	 N_RUADO-PL ;

LEXICON N_RUADO-SG
:%{back%} NMN_RUADO/KYNDÖ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_RUADO-PL
:%{back%} NMN_RUADO/KYNDÖ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KYNDÖ !!≈ @CODE@ kyndö:kyndö
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	 N_KYNDÖ-SG ;
	 N_KYNDÖ-PL ;

LEXICON N_KYNDÖ-SG
:%{front%} NMN_RUADO/KYNDÖ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_KYNDÖ-PL
:%{front%} NMN_RUADO/KYNDÖ-PL   ;

!! ### TWO-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEM WITH UNIQUE +Nom+Sg VOWEL

LEXICON N_JÄLGI  !!≈ @CODE@ jälgi:jälg
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_JÄLGI-SG ;
 N_JÄLGI-PL ;

LEXICON N_JÄLGI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_JÄLGI-SG ;
LEXICON N_JÄLGI-PL
:%{front%} NMN_JÄLGI-PL ;

LEXICON N_JOGI  !!≈ @CODE@ jogi:jog
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_JOGI-SG ;
 N_JOGI-PL ;

LEXICON N_JOGI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_JOGI-SG ;
LEXICON N_JOGI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_JOGI-PL ;


LEXICON N_MUAMO !!≈ @CODE@ muamo:muama
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:%^A2O ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_MUAMO-SG ;
 N_MUAMO-PL ;

LEXICON N_MUAMO-SG
:%{back%} NMN_MUAMO-SG ;
LEXICON N_MUAMO-PL
:%{back%} NMN_MUAMO-PL ;


LEXICON N_TUATTO !!≈ @CODE@ tuatto:tuatta
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!:%^A2O ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_TUATTO-SG ;
 N_TUATTO-PL ;

LEXICON N_TUATTO-SG
:%{back%} NMN_TUATTO-SG ;
LEXICON N_TUATTO-PL
:%{back%} NMN_TUATTO-PL ;

LEXICON N_DIÄDÖ !!≈ @CODE@ diädö:diädä
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Front
!:%^A2O ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_DIÄDÖ-SG ;
 N_DIÄDÖ-PL ;

LEXICON N_DIÄDÖ-SG
:%{front%} NMN_DIÄDÖ-SG ;
LEXICON N_DIÄDÖ-PL
:%{front%} NMN_DIÄDÖ-PL ;
