src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
boba+N:boba N_BOBA  "lelu" ;
buabo+N:buaba N_MUAMO  "isoäiti" ;
diädʼö+N:diädä N_DIÄDÖ  "setä" ;
dökti+N:dökti N_HÄKKI  "tuohiterva" ;
eloipaikanmerki+N:eloi#paikan#merki N_LEIRI  "asuinpaikkamerkintä" ;
elokuu+N:elo#kuu N_KUU  "elokuu" ;
elot+N:elo N_RUNO-PL  "rikkaus" ;
ezipiä+N:ezi#piä N_VYÖ  "etujoukko" ;
gulʼaššu+N:gulʼaššu N_LUGU  "gulassi" ;
guža+N:guža N_OZA  "rahje" ;
hagopiä+N:hago#piä N_VYÖ  "pölkkypää" ;
hanhenliha+N:hanhen#liha N_KALA  "hanhenliha" ;
haugi+N:haug N_JOGI  "hauki" ;
hiät+N:hää N_KUU-PL  "häät" ;
hyppy+N:hyppy N_IDY  "hyppy" ;
höydöipuu+N:höydöipuu N_KUU  "heisi" ;
höžäkkö+N:höžäkkö N_RUADO  "kömpelö" ;
idu+N:idu N_KOIVU  "itu" ;
igä+N:igä N_SÄYNÄ  "ikä" ;
ivyt+N:ivyt N_IDY-PL  "maltaat" ;
ivyt+N:idy N_KOIVU-PL  "maltaat" ;
jagoväli+N:jago#väli N_LEIRI  "jakoväli" ;
jiänlähtö+N:jiän#lähtö N_HÖRÖ  "jäänlähtö" ;
jogi+N:jog N_JOGI  "joki" ;
jouteolo+N:joute#olo N_RUNO  "joutenolo" ;
jyry+N:jyry N_HERY  "ukkonen" ;
kagluremeni+N:kaglu#remeni N_HÄKKI  "kaulahihna" ;
kamu+N:kamu N_KOIVU-SG  "kiire" ;
kangaspuut+N:kangas#puu N_KUU-PL  "kangaspuut" ;
kela+N:kela N_KALA  "kela" ;
keskikylä+N:keski#kylä N_SÄYNÄ  "keskikylä" ;
keskiyö+N:keski#yö N_VYÖ  "keskiyö" ;
kezrävö+N:kezrävö N_HÖRÖ-SG  "kehruu" ;
kida+N:kida N_PADA  "kita" ;
kidalagi+N:kida#lagi N_JÄLGI  "kitalaki" ;
kidžerpiä+N:kidžer#piä N_MUA  "kiharapää" ;
kiiniotettu+N:kiini#otettu N_LUGU  "vanki" ;
kisa+N:kisa N_OZA  "pussi" ;
kiäkky+N:kiäkky N_IDY  "kokkare" ;
kobrumado+N:kobru#mado N_RUADO  "kobra" ;
kodi+N:kodi N_PAPPI  "koti" ;
kuhmu+N:kuhmu N_KOIVU  "kuhmu" ;
käzipuut+N:käzi#puu N_KUU-PL  "kaide (portaissa ym.)" ;
labjot+N+Err/Sub:labjet N_RUNO-PL  "ruumenet" ;
lahjoitusmua+N:lahjoitus#mua N_MUA  "lahjoitusmaa" ;
liygi+N:liygi N_PAPPI  "livvi" ;
loga+N:loga N_OZA-SG  "räkä" ;!Only singular???
lomut+N:lomu N_KOIVU-PL  "romu; roskat; tavarat; työvehkeet" ;
luba+N:luba N_PADA  "lupa" ;
lykky+N:lykky N_IDY-SG  "onni" ;
längipuut+N:längi#puu N_KUU  "länget; länkipuut" ;
löttö+N:löttö N_HÖRÖ  "löttö" ;
löyly+N:löyly N_HERY  "löyly" ;
mallušku+N:mallušku N_  "polvilumpio; pieni malja" ;
matka+N:matka N_KALA  "matka" ;
meččuzvierit+N+Err/Sub:mečču#zvieri N_LEIRI-PL  "metsän eläimet" ;
muamo+N+Use/NG:muama N_MUAMO  "äiti" ;
muaruavot+N:mua#ruado N_RUADO-PL  "maatyöt" ;
muutto+N:muutto N_RUNO  "muutto" ;
muštupiä+N:muštu#piä N_PIÄ  "mustatukkainen henkilö" ;
myödymägi+N:myödy#mäg N_JÄLGI  "myötämäki" ;
mägiremenit+N:mägi#remeni N_PAPPI-PL  "mäkivyöt" ;
mötti+N:mötti N_HÄKKI  "mesikämmen" ;
nagroimua+N:nagroi#mua N_MUA  "naurismaa" ;
nʼababuabo+N:nʼaba#buaba N_MUAMO  "kätilö" ;
paimoi+N:paimoi N_  "paimen" ;
palat+N:pala N_KALA-PL  "kappaleet" ;
pehmendysmerki+N:pehmendys#merki N_PAPPI  "liudennusmerkki" ;
pidosovat+N:pido#soba N_OZA-PL  "pitovaatteet" ;
pii+N:pii N_PII  "(haravan) pii" ;
piipuri+N:piipuri N_LEIRI  "pippuri" ;
pitkypiä+N:pitkypiä N_PIÄ  "pitkäpää" ;
piälagi+N:piä#lag N_JOGI  "päälaki" ;
pletti+N:pletti N_HÄKKI  "ruoska" ;
ponʼa+N:ponʼa N_KALA-SG  "käsitys" ;
pruazniekkulava+N:pruazniekku#lava N_KALA  "juhlalava" ;
pyhät+N:pyhä N_OZA-PL  "(Herran) ehtoollinen" ;
pyy+N:pyy N_PII  "pyy" ;
päičet+N:päičč N_JÄLGI-PL  "päitset" ;
raba+N:raba N-HUM_KALA  "raihnas vanhus" ;
rahat+N:raha N_KALA-PL  "rahat" ;
rahkis+N:rahkis N_  "rahje (valjaissa)" ;
raudupada+N:raudupada N_PADA  "rautapata" ;
ravvat+N:rauda N_KALA-PL  "kuolaimet" ;
ribusovat+N:ribuso N_  "ryysyt" ;
rulʼa+N:rulʼa N_OZA  "ratti" ;
silmänterä+N:silmänterä N_SÄYNÄ  "silmäterä" ;
sinčot+N:sinčot N_KALA-PL  "eteinen" ;
siä+N:siä N_PIÄ  "sää" ;
siändö+N:siändö N_HÖRÖ  "sääntö" ;
suandukivut+N:suandukivut N_KOIVU-PL  "synnytyskivut" ;
suo+N:suo N_SUO  "suo" ;
svuadʼbusobi+N:svuadʼbu#sobi N_PAPPI  "hääpuku" ;
syvyskyndö+N:syvys#kyndö N_KYNDÖ  "syyskyntö" ;
syväinyö+N:syväinyö N_SUO  "keskiyö, sydänyö" ;
syy+N:syy N_PII  "syy" ;
säilytändyruado+N:säilytändy#ruado N_RUADO  "säilytystyö" ;
sängi+N:säng N_JÄLGI  "sänki" ;
tagamua+N:taga#mua N_MUA  "takamaa" ;
tie+N:tie N_KUU  "tie" ;
tuatto+N:tuatta N_TUATTO  "isä" ;
tukat+N:tukat N_OZA-PL  "hiukset" ;
turvuvyö+N:turvu#vyö N_VYÖ  "turvavyö" ;
uboru+N:uboru N_KOIVU  "koru" ;
vago+N:vago N_RUNO  "vako" ;
venä+N:venä N_OZA-SG  "harv. venäjä" ;
venʼa+N:venʼa N_KALA-SG  "venäjä" ;
viga+N:viga N_PADA  "vika" ;
vihmusiä+N:vihmu#siä N_PIÄ  "sadesää" ;
virzut+N:virzu N_RUNO-PL  "virsu" ;
vokalisobu+N:vokali#sobu N_IDY-SG  "vokaalisointu" ;
vuo+N:vuo N_SUO  "vuo" ;
vuozikerähmö+N:vuozi#kerähmö N_KYNDÖ  "vuosikokous" ;
yö+N:yö N_SUO  "yö" ;
zuaherinpesku+N+Err/Sub:zouherin#pesku N_KOIVU-SG  "hienosokeri" ;
ögy+N:ögy N_HERY  "mutina" ;
čiganoinluageri+N:čiganoin#luageri N_LEIRI  "romanileiri" ;
čökeriädy+N:čöke#riädy N_IDY  "kolmen pisteen ryhmä" ;
školareppu+N:škola#reppu N_LUGU  "koulureppu" ;
žuaru+N:žuaru N_KOIVU-SG  "kuumuus" ;
